Colorado, session 2026A, HB1020.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-18-102, amend the
introductory portion; and add (4.5) as follows:
18-18-102. Definitions.
As used in this article 18, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(4.5) "COLORIMETRIC FIELD DRUG TEST" MEANS A PRESUMPTIVE
CHEMICAL SCREENING METHOD PERFORMED OUTSIDE OF A FORENSIC
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

LABORATORY BY SOMEONE OTHER THAN A FORENSIC CHEMIST THAT USES
ONE OR MORE REAGENT SUBSTANCES THAT, WHEN BROUGHT INTO PHYSICAL
CONTACT WITH AN UNKNOWN SUBSTANCE, PRODUCES A VISIBLE COLOR
CHANGE INTENDED TO INDICATE THE POSSIBLE PRESENCE OF A CONTROLLED
SUBSTANCE.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-18-403.5, add (7)
and (8) as follows:
18-18-403.5. Unlawful possession of a controlled substance -
notice to revisor of statutes - repeal.
(7) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTIONS (2) AND (2.5) OF THIS SECTION,
WHEN A COLORIMETRIC FIELD DRUG TEST WAS USED, A PEACE OFFICER SHALL
NOT ARREST A PERSON WHEN THE SOLE BASIS FOR THE ARREST IS A LEVEL 1
DRUG MISDEMEANOR FOR POSSESSION OF A CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(c) OR (2.5)(a)(II) OF THIS SECTION, OR WHEN
THE SOLE BASIS FOR THE ARREST IS A MUNICIPAL DRUG POSSESSION CHARGE,
AND SHALL INSTEAD ISSUE A SUMMONS AND COMPLAINT PURSUANT TO
SECTION 16-2-104.
(8) BEFORE ACCEPTING A PLEA FROM A PERSON CHARGED WITH
POSSESSION OF A CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1),
(2), OR (2.5) OF THIS SECTION, OR FOR A DRUG POSSESSION OFFENSE IN
MUNICIPAL COURT, WHEN A COLORIMETRIC FIELD DRUG TEST WAS USED, A
TRIAL JUDGE SHALL ISSUE AN ADVISEMENT THAT INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING
LANGUAGE: "THE COURT CANNOT ACCEPT A PLEA WITHOUT FIRST ADVISING
THE DEFENDANT THAT PRESUMPTIVE COLORIMETRIC FIELD DRUG TESTS ARE
SUBJECT TO FALSE POSITIVE RESULTS. PRESUMPTIVE COLORIMETRIC FIELD
DRUG TESTS HAVE KNOWN ERROR RATES AND ARE INADMISSIBLE IN COURT.
THE DEFENDANT HAS THE RIGHT TO ENTER A NOT GUILTY PLEA AND TO
REQUEST DRUG TESTING BY AN ACCREDITED FORENSIC LABORATORY."
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 16-2-104 as
follows:
16-2-104. Issuance of summons and complaint.
(1) A summons and complaint may be issued by any A peace officer
for an offense constituting a misdemeanor or a petty offense committed in
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1020

the peace officer's presence or, if not committed in the peace officer's
presence, that the peace officer has probable cause to believe was
committed and probable cause to believe was committed by the person
charged. Except for:
(a) Penalty assessment notices, which must be handled pursuant to
the procedures set forth in section 16-2-201 or 16-2.3-102, a copy of a
summons and complaint so issued must be filed immediately with the
county court before which appearance is required, and a second copy must
be given to the district attorney or deputy district attorney for the county;
AND
(b) WHEN A COLORIMETRIC FIELD DRUG TEST WAS USED AND A
PERSON IS SOLELY SUSPECTED OF A LEVEL 1 DRUG MISDEMEANOR FOR
POSSESSION OF A CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE PURSUANT TO SECTION
18-18-403.5 (2)(c) OR (2.5)(a)(II), OR SOLELY SUSPECTED OF A MUNICIPAL
DRUG POSSESSION CHARGE, A PEACE OFFICER SHALL ISSUE A SUMMONS AND
COMPLAINT AND SHALL NOT ARREST THE PERSON.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 16-3-105, amend (2);
and add (1.3) as follows:
16-3-105. Release by arresting authority.
(1.3) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION, IF A
PERSON IS SOLELY SUSPECTED OF A LEVEL 1 DRUG MISDEMEANOR FOR
POSSESSION OF A CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE PURSUANT TO SECTION
18-18-403.5 (2)(c) OR (2.5)(a)(II), OR SOLELY SUSPECTED OF DRUG
POSSESSION IN VIOLATION OF MUNICIPAL LAW, AND A COLORIMETRIC FIELD
DRUG TEST WAS USED, THE PEACE OFFICER SHALL NOT ARREST THE PERSON
AND SHALL INSTEAD RELEASE THE PERSON AND ISSUE A SUMMONS
COMMANDING THE PERSON'S APPEARANCE AT A LATER DATE.
(2) If the person is released in accordance with subsection (1)(b)
SUBSECTIONS (1)(b) OR (1.3) of this section, he THE PERSON shall be given
a summons and complaint as provided for in sections 16-2-104 and
16-2-106 and shall sign a written acknowledgment of its receipt and a
promise to appear at the time and place specified.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 16-5-206, add
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1020

(1.5)(a.5) as follows:
16-5-206. Summons instead of warrant.
(1.5) (a.5) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTIONS (1) AND (1.5)(a) OF THIS
SECTION, IF A PERSON IS SOLELY SUSPECTED OF A LEVEL 1 DRUG
MISDEMEANOR FOR POSSESSION OF A CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE PURSUANT
TO SECTION 18-18-403.5 (2)(c) OR (2.5)(a)(II), OR SOLELY SUSPECTED OF
DRUG POSSESSION IN VIOLATION OF MUNICIPAL LAW, AND A COLORIMETRIC
FIELD DRUG TEST WAS USED, A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER SHALL ISSUE A
SUMMONS COMMANDING THE APPEARANCE OF THE DEFENDANT INSTEAD OF
A WARRANT FOR THE DEFENDANT'S ARREST.
SECTION 6. Applicability. This act applies to offenses committed
on or after the effective date of this act.
SECTION 7. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1020

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1020